District of Columbia statutes.
22-1833

Trafficking in labor or commercial sex acts.

It is unlawful for an individual or a business to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, obtain, or maintain by any means a person, knowing, or in reckless disregard of the fact that:

(1)

Coercion will be used or is being used to cause the person to provide labor or services or to engage in a commercial sex act; or

(2)

The person is being placed or will be placed or kept in debt bondage.

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 103, 57 DCR 5405
This section is referenced in § 14-311, § 22-1836, § 22-1837, § 22-1839, § 22-1840, and § 23-113.